Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 2651.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Director” means the Director of the Office of Professional Regulation.

“Optician” is a person who is qualified and licensed under this chapter to interpret and fill prescriptions of ophthalmologists or optometrists for ophthalmic lenses or repair and reproduce previously prepared ophthalmic lenses and frames, prepare and deliver work orders to technicians engaged in grinding lenses and fabricate eyewear, verify the accuracy of ophthalmic lenses, and adjust and disperse lenses, specially fabricated optical devices, frames, and appurtenances.

“Optometrist” means a person licensed under chapter 30 of this title.

“Ophthalmologist” means a licensed physician who has had special training in the field of ophthalmology.

“Registered optician trainee” means a person registered as an optician trainee under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; amended

2005, No. 27

, § 74;

2005, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 24.

§ 2652.
Prohibitions.

No person may engage in practice as an optician, or use any initials, letters, wording, abbreviations, or insignia used by an optician unless he or she is licensed under this chapter.

A person may not seek or obtain a license or renewal by means of false or fraudulent actions or representations.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 4.

§ 2653.
Exemptions.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit:

persons, firms, corporations, or others from supplying ophthalmic materials and supplies directly to licensed physicians, licensed optometrists, or opticians;

the sales of magnifying glasses, goggles, nonprescription spectacles, sunglasses, telescopes, binoculars, or similar articles, when sold as merchandise at a regular established place of business;

any person, firm, or corporation from employing or otherwise engaging the services of one or more opticians;

any optician from practicing his or her occupation when the person, firm or corporation conducts his or her or its business in a permanently established place and in a manner which is in keeping with the limitations imposed upon individual opticians under this chapter;

the employment of a person who only performs mechanical work upon inert matter in an optical office, laboratory, or shop.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 4.

§ 2654.
Penalties.

Any person who violates a provision of section 2652 of this title shall be subject to the penalties provided in

3 V.S.A. § 127(c)

.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; amended

2007, No. 29

, § 37.